Illinois, session 104th, HB2465.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Open Meetings Act is amended by changing 5Section 7 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 120/7)7    Sec. 7. Attendance by a means other than physical 8presence.9    (a) If a quorum of the members of the public body is 10physically present as required by Section 2.01, a majority of 11the public body may allow a member of that body to attend the 12meeting by other means if the member is prevented from 13physically attending because of: (i) personal illness or 14disability; (ii) employment purposes or the business of the 15public body; (iii) a family or other emergency; or (iv) 16unexpected childcare obligations; or (v) performance of active 17military duty as a service member. "Other means" is by video or 18audio conference. As used in this subsection: 19    "Active military duty" has the meaning given to "active 20service" in Section 1-10 of the Service Member Employment and 21Reemployment Rights Act.22    "Service member" means a resident of Illinois who is a 23member of any component of the U.S. Armed Forces or the   HB2465- 2 -LRB104 08648 BDA 18701 b1National Guard of any state, the District of Columbia, a 2commonwealth, or a territory of the United States. 3    (b) If a member wishes to attend a meeting by other means, 4the member must notify the recording secretary or clerk of the 5public body before the meeting unless advance notice is 6impractical.7    (c) A majority of the public body may allow a member to 8attend a meeting by other means only in accordance with and to 9the extent allowed by rules adopted by the public body. The 10rules must conform to the requirements and restrictions of 11this Section, may further limit the extent to which attendance 12by other means is allowed, and may provide for the giving of 13additional notice to the public or further facilitate public 14access to meetings. 15    (d) The limitations of this Section shall not apply to (i) 16closed meetings of (A) public bodies with statewide 17jurisdiction, (B) Illinois library systems with jurisdiction 18over a specific geographic area of more than 4,500 square 19miles, (C) municipal transit districts with jurisdiction over 20a specific geographic area of more than 4,500 square miles, or 21(D) local workforce innovation areas with jurisdiction over a 22specific geographic area of more than 4,500 square miles or 23(ii) open or closed meetings of State advisory boards or 24bodies that do not have authority to make binding 25recommendations or determinations or to take any other 26substantive action. State advisory boards or bodies, public   HB2465- 3 -LRB104 08648 BDA 18701 b1bodies with statewide jurisdiction, Illinois library systems 2with jurisdiction over a specific geographic area of more than 34,500 square miles, municipal transit districts with 4jurisdiction over a specific geographic area of more than 54,500 square miles, and local workforce investment areas with 6jurisdiction over a specific geographic area of more than 74,500 square miles, however, may permit members to attend 8meetings by other means only in accordance with and to the 9extent allowed by specific procedural rules adopted by the 10body. For the purposes of this Section, "local workforce 11innovation area" means any local workforce innovation area or 12areas designated by the Governor pursuant to the federal 13Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act or its reauthorizing 14legislation. 15    (e) Subject to the requirements of Section 2.06 but 16notwithstanding any other provision of law, an open or closed 17meeting subject to this Act may be conducted by audio or video 18conference, without the physical presence of a quorum of the 19members, so long as the following conditions are met:20        (1) the Governor or the Director of the Illinois 21    Department of Public Health has issued a disaster 22    declaration related to public health concerns because of a 23    disaster as defined in Section 4 of the Illinois Emergency 24    Management Agency Act, and all or part of the jurisdiction 25    of the public body is covered by the disaster area;26        (2) the head of the public body as defined in   HB2465- 4 -LRB104 08648 BDA 18701 b1    subsection (e) of Section 2 of the Freedom of Information 2    Act determines that an in-person meeting or a meeting 3    conducted under this Act is not practical or prudent 4    because of a disaster;5        (3) all members of the body participating in the 6    meeting, wherever their physical location, shall be 7    verified and can hear one another and can hear all 8    discussion and testimony;9        (4) for open meetings, members of the public present 10    at the regular meeting location of the body can hear all 11    discussion and testimony and all votes of the members of 12    the body, unless attendance at the regular meeting 13    location is not feasible due to the disaster, including 14    the issued disaster declaration, in which case the public 15    body must make alternative arrangements and provide notice 16    pursuant to this Section of such alternative arrangements 17    in a manner to allow any interested member of the public 18    access to contemporaneously hear all discussion, 19    testimony, and roll call votes, such as by offering a 20    telephone number or a web-based link;21        (5) at least one member of the body, chief legal 22    counsel, or chief administrative officer is physically 23    present at the regular meeting location, unless unfeasible 24    due to the disaster, including the issued disaster 25    declaration; and26        (6) all votes are conducted by roll call, so each   HB2465- 5 -LRB104 08648 BDA 18701 b1    member's vote on each issue can be identified and 2    recorded.3        (7) Except in the event of a bona fide emergency, 48 4    hours' notice shall be given of a meeting to be held 5    pursuant to this Section. Notice shall be given to all 6    members of the public body, shall be posted on the website 7    of the public body, and shall also be provided to any news 8    media who has requested notice of meetings pursuant to 9    subsection (a) of Section 2.02 of this Act. If the public 10    body declares a bona fide emergency:11            (A) Notice shall be given pursuant to subsection 12        (a) of Section 2.02 of this Act, and the presiding 13        officer shall state the nature of the emergency at the 14        beginning of the meeting.15            (B) The public body must comply with the verbatim 16        recording requirements set forth in Section 2.06 of 17        this Act.18        (8) Each member of the body participating in a meeting 19    by audio or video conference for a meeting held pursuant 20    to this Section is considered present at the meeting for 21    purposes of determining a quorum and participating in all 22    proceedings.23        (9) In addition to the requirements for open meetings 24    under Section 2.06, public bodies holding open meetings 25    under this subsection (e) must also keep a verbatim record 26    of all their meetings in the form of an audio or video   HB2465- 6 -LRB104 08648 BDA 18701 b1    recording. Verbatim records made under this paragraph (9) 2    shall be made available to the public under, and are 3    otherwise subject to, the provisions of Section 2.06.4        (10) The public body shall bear all costs associated 5    with compliance with this subsection (e).6(Source: P.A. 103-311, eff. 7-28-23.)